ro-RO: Dimensiuni hartă (foaie): 11 x 17 in; 12 x 18 in; 16 x 20 in; 18 x 24 in; 24 x 36 in; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; Altele
ru: Размер карты (лист): 11 × 17 дюймов; 12 × 18 дюймов; 16 × 20 дюймов; 18 × 24 дюймов; 24 × 36 дюймов; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; Другое
fr: Dimensions de la carte (feuille): 11 x 17 po; 12 x 18 po; 16 x 20 po; 18 x 24 po; 24 x 36 po; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; Autre
nb: Kartstørrelse (ark): 11 x 17 tommer; 12 x 18 tommer; 16 x 20 tommer; 18 x 24 tommer; 24 x 36 tommer; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; Annet
el: Μέγεθος χάρτη (φύλλο): 11 x 17 in; 12 x 18 in; 16 x 20 in; 18 x 24 in; 24 x 36 in; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; Άλλο
bg-BG: Размер на картата (лист): 11 x 17 инча; 12 x 18 инча; 16 x 20 инча; 18 x 24 инча; 24 x 36 инча; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; Друго
es: Tamaño del mapa (hoja): 11 x 17 in; 12 x 18 in; 16 x 20 in; 18 x 24 in; 24 x 36 in; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; Otro
sv: Kartstorlek (ark): 11 x 17 tum; 12 x 18 tum; 16 x 20 tum; 18 x 24 tum; 24 x 36 tum; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; Annat
pt-PT: Tamanho do mapa (folha): 11 x 17 pol.; 12 x 18 pol.; 16 x 20 pol.; 18 x 24 pol.; 24 x 36 pol.; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; Outro
sk-SK: Veľkosť mapy (hárok): 11 x 17 palcov; 12 x 18 palcov; 16 x 20 palcov; 18 x 24 palcov; 24 x 36 palcov; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; Iná
de: Kartengröße (Blatt): 11 x 17 Zoll; 12 x 18 Zoll; 16 x 20 Zoll; 18 x 24 Zoll; 24 x 36 Zoll; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; Sonstige
sl-SI: Velikost karte (list): 11 x 17 in; 12 x 18 in; 16 x 20 in; 18 x 24 in; 24 x 36 in; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; Drugo
hu: Térkép mérete (lap): 11 x 17 hüvelyk; 12 x 18 hüvelyk; 16 x 20 hüvelyk; 18 x 24 hüvelyk; 24 x 36 hüvelyk; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; Egyéb
vi: Kích thước bản đồ (tờ): 11 x 17 in; 12 x 18 in; 16 x 20 in; 18 x 24 in; 24 x 36 in; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; Khác
hr-HR: Veličina karte (list): 11 x 17 in; 12 x 18 in; 16 x 20 in; 18 x 24 in; 24 x 36 in; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; Ostalo
th: ขนาดแผนที่ (แผ่น): 11 x 17 นิ้ว; 12 x 18 นิ้ว; 16 x 20 นิ้ว; 18 x 24 นิ้ว; 24 x 36 นิ้ว; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; อื่นๆ
pl: Rozmiar mapy (arkusz): 11 x 17 cali; 12 x 18 cali; 16 x 20 cali; 18 x 24 cali; 24 x 36 cali; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; Inne
ja: 地図のサイズ（シート）: 11 x 17インチ; 12 x 18インチ; 16 x 20インチ; 18 x 24インチ; 24 x 36インチ; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; その他
nl: Kaart maat (vel): 11 x 17 inch; 12 x 18 inch; 16 x 20 inch; 18 x 24 inch; 24 x 36 inch; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; Anders
da: Kortstørrelse (ark): 11 x 17 in; 12 x 18 in; 16 x 20 in; 18 x 24 in; 24 x 36 in; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; Andet
tr: Harita boyutu (sayfa): 11 x 17 inç; 12 x 18 inç; 16 x 20 inç; 18 x 24 inç; 24 x 36 inç; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; Diğer
en: Map size (sheet): 11 x 17 in; 12 x 18 in; 16 x 20 in; 18 x 24 in; 24 x 36 in; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; Other
zh-CN: 地图尺寸（图幅）: 11 x 17 英寸; 12 x 18 英寸; 16 x 20 英寸; 18 x 24 英寸; 24 x 36 英寸; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; 其他
it: Dimensioni della mappa (foglio): 11 x 17 in; 12 x 18 in; 16 x 20 in; 18 x 24 in; 24 x 36 in; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; Altro
pt-BR: Mapa tamanho (folha): 11 x 17 pol.; 12 x 18 pol.; 16 x 20 pol.; 18 x 24 pol.; 24 x 36 pol.; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; Outro
zh-TW: 地圖尺寸（紙張）: 11 x 17 吋; 12 x 18 吋; 16 x 20 吋; 18 x 24 吋; 24 x 36 吋; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; 其他
fi: Kartan koko (arkki): 11 x 17 in; 12 x 18 in; 16 x 20 in; 18 x 24 in; 24 x 36 in; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; Muu
ko: 지도 크기(시트): 11 x 17in; 12 x 18in; 16 x 20in; 18 x 24in; 24 x 36in; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; 기타
lt-LT: Žemėlapio dydis (lapas): 11 x 17 col.; 12 x 18 col.; 16 x 20 col.; 18 x 24 col.; 24 x 36 col.; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; Kita
cs: Velikost mapy (list): 11 × 17 in; 12 × 18 in; 16 × 20 in; 18 × 24 in; 24 × 36 in; A0; A1; A2; A3; A4; Jiné